California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
 and long term. Up to six million dollars ($6,000,000) of the funds described in paragraph (33) of subdivision (c) of Section 30914 may be expended by MTC, the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District (BART), and the Peninsula Corridor Joint Powers Board (Caltrain) for the plan. A project management team comprised of staff from MTC, Caltrain, the High-Speed Rail Authority, and BART shall provide day-to-day project management of the technical development of the plan. The plan shall formulate strategies to integrate passenger rail systems, improve interfaces with connecting services, expand the regional rapid transit network, and coordinate investments with transit-supportive land use. The plan shall be directed by a steering committee consisting of appointees from the Department of Transportation (Caltrans), BART, Caltrain, the National Railroad Passenger Corporation (Amtrak), the Capitol Corridor Joint Powers Authority, the Altamont Commuter Express, the High-Speed Rail Authority, MTC, the Sonoma-Marin
 Area Rail Transit District (SMART), the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority, the Solano Transportation Authority, the Association of Bay Area Governments, the Transbay Joint Powers Authority, the Port of Oakland, the Alameda County Transportation Commission, the Contra Costa Transportation Authority, the Transportation Authority of Marin, the Napa County Transportation Planning Agency, the San Francisco County Transportation Authority, the San Mateo City-County Association of Governments, the San Francisco Municipal Transportation Agency, and the owners of standard gauge rail. Under direction from the steering committee and with input from Bay Area transit agencies, MTC shall act as the fiscal agent for the study and oversee consultant contracts on behalf of the project management team. The plan proposals shall be evaluated using performance criteria, including, but not limited to, transit-supportive land use and access, ridership, cost-effectiveness, regional network connectivity, and capital and
 operating financial stability. Additional performance criteria shall be developed as necessary. The plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Identification of issues in connectivity, access, capacity, operations, and cost-effectiveness.

(2) Identification of opportunities to enhance rail connectivity and to maximize passenger convenience when transferring between systems, including the study of the feasibility and construction of an intermodal transfer hub at Niles (Shinn Street) Junction.

(3) Recommendation of improvements to the interface with shuttles, buses, other rail systems, and other feeder modes.

(4) Identification of potential impacts on capacity constraints and operations on existing passenger and freight
 carriers.

(5) Identification of bottlenecks where added capacity could cost-effectively increase performance.

(6) Recommendation of potential efficiency improvements through economies of scale, such as through joint vehicle procurement and maintenance facilities.

(7) Recommendation of strategies to acquire right-of-way and station property to preserve future service options.

(8) Identification of potential capital and operating funding sources for proposed actions.

(9) Identification of locations where the presence of passenger rail could stimulate redevelopment and thereby direct growth to the urban core.

(10) Recommendation
 of technology-appropriate service expansion in specific corridors. Technologies to be considered include conventional rail transit modes, bus rapid transit, and emerging rail technologies. Identify phasing strategies for the implementation of rail services where appropriate.

(11) Examination of how recommendations would integrate with proposed high-speed rail to the Central Valley and southern California. The intent of this element of the study is to help reduce the number of alternatives that the High-Speed Rail Authority would need to evaluate as part of any follow-on environmental assessment of future high-speed rail system access to the Bay Area. Selection of a preferred alignment for the Bay Area shall remain the responsibility of the High-Speed Rail Authority pursuant to Section 185032 of the Public Utilities Code.

(12) Recommendation of a governance strategy to implement
 and operate future regional rail services.

This subdivision shall only be effective if the voters approve the toll increase as set forth in Section 30921. Any expenditures incurred by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission or the project sponsors identified in paragraph (33) of subdivision (c) of Section 30914 related to the requirements of this subdivision, including any study and administration, shall be appropriate charges against toll revenue to be reimbursed from toll revenues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 34.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

30914.7.

(a) If the voters approve a toll increase pursuant to Section 30923, the authority shall, consistent with the provisions of this section fund the projects and programs described in this subdivision that shall collectively be known as the Regional Measure 3 expenditure plan by bonding or transfers to the Metropolitan Transportation Commission. These projects and programs have been determined to reduce congestion or to make improvements to travel in the toll bridge corridors, from toll revenues of all bridges:

(1) BART Expansion Cars. Purchase new railcars for the Bay Area Rapid Transit District (BART) to expand its fleet and improve reliability. The project sponsor is BART. Five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000).

(2) Bay Area Corridor Express Lanes. Fund the environmental review, design, and construction of express lanes to complete the Bay Area Express Lane Network, including supportive operational improvements to connecting transportation facilities. Eligible projects include, but are not limited to, express lanes on Interstate 80, Interstate 580, and Interstate 680 in the Counties of Alameda and Contra Costa, Interstate 880 in the County of Alameda, Interstate 280 in the City and County of San Francisco, Highway 101 in the City and County of San Francisco and the County of San Mateo, State Route 84 and State Route 92 in the Counties of Alameda and San Mateo, Interstate 80 from Red Top Road to the intersection with Interstate 505 in the County of Solano, and express lanes in the County of Santa Clara. Eligible project sponsors include the Bay Area Infrastructure Financing Authority, and any countywide or multicounty agency in a bay area county that is
 authorized to implement express lanes. The Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall make funds available based on performance criteria, including benefit-cost and project readiness. Three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000).

(3) Goods Movement and Mitigation. Provide funding to reduce truck traffic congestion and mitigate its environmental effects. Eligible projects include, but are not limited to, improvements in the County of Alameda to enable more goods to be shipped by rail, access improvements on Interstate 580, Interstate 80, and Interstate 880, and improved access to the Port of Oakland. The Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall consult and coordinate with the Alameda County Transportation Commission to select projects for the program. Eligible applicants include cities, counties, countywide transportation agencies, rail operators, and the Port of Oakland. The project sponsors are the Metropolitan Transportation Commission
 and the Alameda County Transportation Commission. One hundred sixty million dollars ($160,000,000).

(4) San Francisco Bay Trail/Safe Routes to Transit. Provide funding for a competitive grant program to fund bicycle and pedestrian access improvements on and in the vicinity of the state-owned toll bridges connecting to rail transit stations and ferry terminals. Eligible applicants include cities, counties, transit operators, school districts, community colleges, and universities. The project sponsor is the Metropolitan Transportation Commission. One hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000).

(5) Ferry Enhancement Program. Provide funding to purchase new vessels, upgrade and rehabilitate existing vessels, build facilities and landside improvements, and upgrade existing facilities. The project sponsor is the San Francisco Bay Area Water Emergency Transportation Authority. Three
 hundred million dollars ($300,000,000).

(6) BART to San Jose Phase 2. Extend BART from Berryessa Station to San Jose and Santa Clara. The project sponsor is the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority. Three hundred seventy-five million dollars ($375,000,000).

(7) Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit District (SMART). Provide funding to extend the rail system north of the Charles M. Schulz-Sonoma County Airport to the Cities of Windsor and Healdsburg. The project sponsor is the Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit District. Forty million dollars ($40,000,000).

(8) Capitol Corridor. Provide funding for track infrastructure that will improve the performance of Capital Corridor passenger rail operations by reducing travel times, adding service frequencies, and improving system safety and reliability. The project sponsor is the
 Capital Corridor Joint Powers Authority. Ninety million dollars ($90,000,000).

(9) Caltrain Downtown Extension. Extend Caltrain from its current terminus at Fourth Street and King Street to the Transbay Transit Center. The Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall allocate funding to the agency designated to build the project, which shall be the project sponsor. Three hundred twenty-five million dollars ($325,000,000).

(10) MUNI Fleet Expansion and Facilities. Fund replacement and expansion of the San Francisco Municipal Transportation Agency’s MUNI vehicle fleet and associated facilities. The project sponsor is the San Francisco Municipal Transportation Agency. One hundred forty million dollars ($140,000,000).

(11) Core Capacity Transit Improvements. Implement recommendations from the Core Capacity Transit Study
 and other ideas to maximize person throughput in the transbay corridor. Eligible projects include, but are not limited to, transbay bus improvements and high-occupancy vehicle (HOV) lane access improvements. Priority funding shall be the Alameda-Contra Costa Transit District’s (AC Transit) Tier 1 and Tier 2 projects identified in the study. The project sponsors are the Metropolitan Transportation Commission, Alameda County Transportation Commission, and AC Transit. One hundred forty million dollars ($140,000,000).

(12) Alameda-Contra Costa Transit District (AC Transit) Rapid Bus Corridor Improvements. Fund bus purchases and capital improvements to reduce travel times and increase service frequency along key corridors. The project sponsors are AC Transit and Alameda County Transportation Commission. One hundred million dollars ($100,000,000).

(13) Transbay Rail Crossing. Fund
 preliminary engineering, environmental review, and design of a second transbay rail crossing and its approaches to provide additional rail capacity, increased reliability, and improved resiliency to the corridor. Subject to approval by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission, funds may also be used for construction, and, if sufficient matching funds are secured, to fully fund a useable segment of the project. The project sponsor is the Bay Area Rapid Transit District. Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000).

(14) Tri-Valley Transit Access Improvements. Provide interregional and last-mile transit connections on the Interstate 580 corridor in the County of Alameda within the Tri-Valley area of Dublin, Pleasanton, and Livermore. The Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall consult with the Alameda County Transportation Commission, the Bay Area Rapid Transit District, and local jurisdictions to determine the project sponsor. One hundred million
 dollars ($100,000,000).

(15) Eastridge to BART Regional Connector. Extend Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority light rail from the Alum Rock station to the Eastridge Transit Center. The project sponsor is the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority. One hundred thirty million dollars ($130,000,000).

(16) San Jose Diridon Station. Redesign, rebuild, and expand Diridon Station to more efficiently and effectively accommodate existing regional rail services, future BART and high-speed rail service, and Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority light rail and buses. The project sponsor shall consider accommodating a future connection to Norman Y. Mineta San Jose International Airport and prioritizing non-auto access modes. The project sponsor is the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority. One hundred million dollars ($100,000,000).

(17) Dumbarton Corridor Improvements. Fund planning, environmental review, design, and construction of capital improvements within Dumbarton Bridge and rail corridor in the Counties of Alameda and San Mateo to relieve congestion, increase person throughput, and offer reliable travel times. Eligible projects include, but are not limited to, the projects recommended in the Dumbarton Corridor Transportation Study and improvements to facilitate rail and transit connectivity among the Altamont Corridor Express, Capitol Corridor, and Bay Area Rapid Transit District, including a rail connection at Shinn Station. The project sponsors are the Bay Area Toll Authority, Alameda County Transportation Commission, the San Mateo County Transit District, and the San Mateo County Transportation Authority. One hundred thirty million dollars ($130,000,000).

(18) Highway 101/State Route 92 Interchange.
 Fund improvements to the interchange of Highway 101 and State Route 92 in the County of San Mateo. The project is jointly sponsored by the City/County Association of Governments of San Mateo County and the San Mateo County Transportation Authority. Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000).

(19) Contra Costa Interstate 680/State Route 4 Interchange Improvements. Fund improvements to the Interstate 680/State Route 4 interchange to improve safety and reduce congestion, including, but not limited to, a new direct connector between northbound Interstate 680 and westbound State Route 4, a new direct connector between eastbound State Route 4 and southbound Interstate 680, and widening of State Route 4 to add auxiliary lanes and high-occupancy vehicle lanes. The project sponsor is the Contra Costa Transportation Authority. Two hundred ten million dollars ($210,000,000).

(20) Highway
 101-Marin/Sonoma Narrows. Construct northbound and southbound high-occupancy vehicle lanes on Highway 101 between Petaluma Boulevard South in Petaluma and Atherton Avenue in Novato. The project sponsors are the Transportation Authority of Marin and the Sonoma County Transportation Authority. One hundred twenty million dollars ($120,000,000).

(21) Solano County Interstate 80/Interstate 680/State Route 12 Interchange Project. Construct Red Top Road interchange and westbound Interstate 80 to southbound Interstate 680 connector. The project sponsor is the Solano Transportation Authority. One hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000).

(22) Interstate 80 Westbound Truck Scales. Improve freight mobility, reliability, and safety on the Interstate 80 corridor by funding improvements to the Interstate 80 Westbound Truck Scales in the County of Solano. The project sponsor is the Solano
 Transportation Authority. One hundred five million dollars ($105,000,000).

(23) State Route 37 Improvements. Fund near-term and longer-term improvements to State Route 37 to improve the roadway’s mobility, safety, and long-term resiliency to sea level rise and flooding. For the purposes of the environmental review and design, the project shall include the segment of State Route 37 from the intersection in Marin County with Highway 101 to the intersection with Interstate 80 in the County of Solano. Capital funds may used on any segment along this corridor, as determined by the project sponsors. The project is jointly sponsored by the Transportation Authority of Marin, the Napa Valley Transportation Authority, the Solano Transportation Authority, and the Sonoma County Transportation Authority. Funds for this project may be allocated to any of the project sponsors. One hundred million dollars ($100,000,000)

(24) San Rafael Transit Center. Construct a replacement to the San Rafael (Bettini) Transit Center on an existing or new site, or both, in downtown San Rafael. The selected alternative shall be approved by the City of San Rafael, the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District, the Transportation Authority of Marin, and Marin Transit. The project sponsor is the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District. Thirty million dollars ($30,000,000).

(25) Richmond-San Rafael Bridge Access Improvements. Fund eastbound and westbound improvements in the Richmond-San Rafael Bridge corridor, including a direct connector from northbound Highway 101 to eastbound Interstate 580, westbound access and operational improvements in the vicinity of the toll plaza east of the bridge in Contra Costa County, and Richmond Parkway interchange improvements. Of the amount allocated to
 this project, one hundred thirty-five million dollars ($135,000,000) shall be dedicated to the direct connector from northbound Highway 101 to eastbound Interstate 580 in Marin County and seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) shall be dedicated to the projects in Contra Costa County. The project sponsors are the Bay Area Toll Authority, the Contra Costa Transportation Authority, and the Transportation Authority of Marin. Two hundred ten million dollars ($210,000,000).

(26) North Bay Transit Access Improvements. Provide funding for transit improvements, including, but not limited to, bus capital projects, including vehicles, transit facilities, and access to transit facilities, benefiting the Counties of Marin, Sonoma, Napa, Solano, and Contra Costa. Priority shall be given to projects that are fully funded, ready for construction, and serving rail transit or transit service that operates primarily on existing or fully funded high-occupancy
 vehicle lanes. The project sponsor is the Metropolitan Transportation Commission. Eligible applicants are any transit operator providing service in the Counties of Contra Costa, Marin, Napa, Solano, or Sonoma. One hundred million dollars ($100,000,000).

(27) State Route 29. Eligible project expenses include State Route 29 major intersection improvements, including Soscol Junction, and signal and signage improvements, which may include multimodal infrastructure and safety improvements between Carneros Highway (State Route 12/121) and American Canyon Road. The project sponsor is the Napa Valley Transportation Authority. Twenty million dollars ($20,000,000).

(28) Next-Generation Clipper Transit Fare Payment System. Provide funding to design, develop, test, implement, and transition to the next generation of Clipper, the bay area’s transit fare payment system. The next-generation
 system will support a universal, consistent, and seamless transit fare payment system for the riders of transit agencies in the bay area. The project sponsor is the Metropolitan Transportation Commission. Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000).

(29) Interstate 680/Interstate 880/Route 262 Freeway Connector. Connect Interstate 680 and Interstate 880 in southern Alameda County to improve traffic movement, reduce congestion, and improve operations and safety. The project sponsor is the Alameda County Transportation Commission. Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000).

(30) Interstate 680/State Route 84 Interchange Reconstruction Project. Improve safety and regional and interregional connectivity by conforming State Route 84 to expressway standards between south of Ruby Hill Drive and the Interstate 680 interchange in southern Alameda County and implementing additional improvements to
 reduce weaving and merging conflicts and help address the additional traffic demand between Interstate 680 and State Route 84. The project sponsor is the Alameda County Transportation Commission. Eighty-five million dollars ($85,000,000).

(31) Interstate 80 Transit Improvements. Fund improvements to support expanded bus service in the Interstate 80 corridor including, but not limited to, bus purchases, expansion of the WestCAT storage yard and maintenance facility. Fund implementation of the San Pablo Avenue Multi-modal Corridor (AC Transit). The project sponsor is the Contra Costa Transportation Authority. Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000).

(32) Byron Highway-Vasco Road Airport Connector. Fund construction of a new connector between Byron Highway and Vasco Road south of Camino Diablo Road as well as shoulder and other improvements to the Byron Highway, including a
 railroad grade separation, to improve safety and access to the Byron Airport and to facilitate economic development and access for goods movement in East Contra Costa County. The project sponsor is the Contra Costa Transportation Authority. Ten million dollars ($10,000,000).

(33) Vasco Road Safety Improvements. Fund the widening of lanes and construction of a concrete median barrier along 2.5 miles of Vasco Road beginning approximately three miles north of the Contra Costa/Alameda County Line. The project sponsor is the Contra Costa Transportation Authority. Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000).

(34) East Contra Costa County Transit Intermodal Center. Fund the construction of a Transit Intermodal Center in Brentwood enhancing access to eBART and Mokelumne Bike Trail/Pedestrian Overcrossing at State Route 4. The project sponsor is the Contra Costa Transportation Authority. Fifteen
 million dollars ($15,000,000).

(35) Interstate 680 Transit Improvements. Fund improvements that will enhance transit service in the Interstate 680 corridor, including, but not limited to, implementing bus operations on shoulder (BOS), technology-based intermodal transit centers/managed parking lots and development of technology to enhance real-time travel information. Fund implementation of Shared Autonomous Vehicles (SAVs) to improve first and last mile transit connectivity. The project sponsor is the Contra Costa Transportation Authority. Ten million dollars ($10,000,000).

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30923, if the authority selects a toll increase to be placed on the ballot in an amount less than three dollars ($3), the funding assigned to the projects and programs identified in subdivision (a) shall be adjusted proportionately to account for reduced funding
 capacity. The authority shall adopt a resolution detailing the updated Regional Measure 3 capital and operating funding available and listing the revised funding amounts for each project within 90 days of the certification of the election by the last county to certify the election on the toll increase. The authority shall update this resolution as needed to reflect additional tolls approved in subsequent elections.

(c) (1) Not more than 16 percent, up to sixty million dollars ($60,000,000), of the revenues generated each year from the toll increase approved by the voters pursuant to Section 30923 shall be made available annually for the purpose of providing operating assistance as set forth in the authority’s annual budget resolution for the purposes listed in paragraph (2). The funds shall be made available to the provider of the transit services subject to the performance measures described in paragraph (3).

(2) The Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall annually fund the following operating programs from the revenue generated each year from the toll increase approved by the voters pursuant to Section 30923 as another component of the Regional Measure 3 expenditure plan:

(A) The San Francisco Transbay Terminal. Eight percent of the amount available for operating assistance pursuant to paragraph (1), not to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000). These funds are available for transportation-related costs associated with operating the terminal. The Transbay Joint Powers Authority shall pursue other long-term, dedicated operating revenue to fund its operating costs. To the extent that a portion or all of the toll revenue provided pursuant to this subparagraph is not needed in a given fiscal year, the Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall reduce the allocation accordingly.

(B) (i) Expanded Ferry Service. Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in the first year of allocation, fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) in the second year of allocation, twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) in the third year of allocation, and twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) in the fourth year of allocation. These allocation amounts shall be subject to the adjustments in subdivision (b). In the fifth year of allocation and thereafter, 58 percent of the amount available for operating assistance pursuant to paragraph (1), not to exceed thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000). These funds shall be made available to the San Francisco Bay Area Water Emergency Transportation Authority (WETA) to support expanded ferry service, including increased frequencies of existing routes and the operation of new routes.

(ii) To the extent that funds provided pursuant
 to clause (i) are not requested for expenditure by WETA in a given year, the funds shall be held by the authority in a reserve account. Those funds shall be made available to WETA for any capital or operating purpose. Before receiving an allocation of those funds, WETA shall submit a request to the Metropolitan Transportation Commission detailing how the funds shall be used. An allocation of those funds shall constitute an augmentation of the funding provided in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) and be treated as such in any reports by the authority regarding the Regional Measure 3 expenditure plan.

(C) Regional Express Bus. Thirty-four percent of the amount available for operating assistance pursuant to paragraph (1), not to exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000), to be distributed for bus service in the bridge corridors, prioritizing bus routes that carry the greatest number of transit riders. To the extent that a portion or all of the
 toll revenue provided pursuant to this subparagraph is not needed in a given fiscal year, the Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall reduce the allocation accordingly.

(3) Before the allocation of revenue for transit operating assistance under subparagraphs (A) and (C) of paragraph (2), the Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall:

(A) Adopt performance measures related to fare-box recovery, ridership, or other indicators, as appropriate. The performance measures shall be developed in consultation with the affected project sponsors.

(B) Execute an operating agreement with the sponsor of the project. This agreement shall include, but is not limited to, an operating plan that is consistent with the adopted performance measures. The agreement shall include a schedule of projected fare revenues or other
 forecast revenue and any other operating funding that will be dedicated to the service or terminal. For any individual project sponsor, this operating agreement may include additional requirements, as determined by the commission.

(C) In an operating agreement executed pursuant to subparagraph (B), the Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall grant a project sponsor at least five years to achieve the adopted performance measures. The Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall use a ridership forecast as the basis for performance measures adopted pursuant to subparagraph (A) and to establish performance measures in following years. If the transit service of a project sponsor does not achieve the performance measures within the timeframe granted to the project sponsor, the project sponsor shall notify the Metropolitan Transportation Commission. The Metropolitan Transportation Commission may revise the performance measures, extend the
 timeframe to achieve the performance measures, or take action to reduce the funding available for operations if the performance measures are not met within the new timeframe.

(4) Before Metropolitan Transportation Commission providing funding to the San Francisco Bay Area Water Emergency Transportation Authority (WETA) under subdivision (a) or this subdivision, WETA and the MTC shall do the following, as applicable:

(A) WETA shall adopt a plan that includes systemwide and route-specific performance measures related to fare-box recovery, ridership, and any other measures as deemed appropriate by WETA in consultation with MTC.

(B) WETA and MTC shall execute an operating agreement that establishes a five-year plan for new or enhanced services and outlines incremental steps needed to achieve a reasonable level of service
 productivity and cost-effectiveness as compared to similar ferry services provided across the bay area.

(C) After the time period identified in subparagraph (B), and if reasonable, but incomplete progress has been achieved to meet the performance measures identified in subparagraph (A), WETA, in consultation with MTC, may propose a new timeframe, not longer than an additional five years, to achieve the performance measures and take needed steps to remedy the service to meet the measures. In the event that the performance measures are not met within the new timeframe, WETA may seek additional time to achieve the measures and MTC may determine whether services should continue and may establish other conditions to service in consultation with WETA. In all cases, funds not spent or made available to WETA shall be returned to the reserve account established pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).

(D) WETA shall use the plan identified in subparagraph (A) to prioritize the use of capital funding made available by this section to support its mission as the operator of ferry services.

(E) This section does not restrict WETA with respect to meeting its obligations as the coordinating agency for water transit response to regional emergencies.

(d) (1) For all projects authorized under subdivision (a), the project sponsor shall submit an initial project report to the Metropolitan Transportation Commission within six months of the election approving the toll increase. This report shall include all information required to describe the project in detail, including the status of any environmental documents relevant to the project, additional funds required to fully fund the project, the amount, if
 any, of funds expended to date, and a summary of any impediments to the completion of the project. This report, or an updated report, shall include a detailed financial plan and shall notify the commission if the project sponsor will request toll revenue within the subsequent 12 months. The project sponsor shall update this report as needed or requested by the commission. Funds shall not be allocated by the commission for any project authorized by subdivision (a) until the project sponsor submits the initial project report, and the report is reviewed and approved by the commission.

(2) If multiple project sponsors are listed for projects listed in subdivision (a), the commission shall identify a lead sponsor in coordination with all identified sponsors, for purposes of allocating funds. For any projects authorized under subdivision (a), the commission shall have the option of requiring a memorandum of understanding between itself and the
 project sponsor or sponsors that shall include any specific requirements that must be met before the allocation of funds provided under subdivision (a).

(e) If a program or project identified in subdivision (a) has cost savings after completion, taking into account construction costs and an estimate of future settlement claims, or cannot be completed or cannot continue due to delivery or financing obstacles making the completion or continuation of the program or project unrealistic, the commission shall consult with the program or project sponsor. After consulting with the sponsor, the commission shall hold a public hearing concerning the program or project. After the hearing, the commission may vote to modify the program or the project’s scope, decrease its level of funding, or reassign some or all of the funds to another project within the same bridge corridor. If a program or project identified in subdivision (a) is to be implemented with
 other funds not derived from tolls, the commission shall follow the same consultation and hearing process described above and may vote thereafter to reassign the funds to another project consistent with the intent of this chapter.

(f) If the voters approve a toll increase pursuant to Section 30923, the authority shall within 24 months of the election date include the projects in a long-range bridge toll plan. The authority shall update its long-range plan as required to maintain its viability as a strategic plan for funding projects authorized by this section. The authority shall, by January 1, 2020, submit its updated long-range bridge toll plan to the transportation policy committee of each house of the Legislature for review. This subdivision, to the extent a plan is prepared under this section, supersedes the requirement to prepare and submit a 20-year toll bridge expenditure plan to the Legislature for adoption pursuant to subdivision (h)
 of Section 30914.

(g) This section does not alter the obligations of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission with respect to the requirements of Section 65080 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 207.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

30915.

(a) With respect to all construction and improvement projects specified in Sections 30913, 30914, and 30914.7, project sponsors and the department shall seek funding from all other potential sources, including, but not limited to, the State Highway Account and federal matching funds. The project sponsors and department shall report to the authority concerning the funds obtained under this subdivision.

(b) Local funds that have previously been committed to projects and programs identified in subdivision (a) of Section 30914.7 shall not be supplanted by the funding assigned to projects and programs pursuant to Section 30914.7 unless the project
 sponsor has secured a full funding plan for the project, or the local funds are needed to maintain transit service levels or fund a critical safety or maintenance need.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 650, Sec. 8.   (SB 595)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

30916.

(a) The base toll rate for vehicles crossing the state-owned toll bridges within the geographic jurisdiction of the commission as of January 1, 2003, is as follows:Number of AxlesToll Two axles$1.00Three axles3.00Four axles5.25Five axles8.25Six axles9.00Seven axles & more10.50(b) If the voters approve a
 toll increase, pursuant to Section 30921, commencing July 1, 2004, the base toll rate for vehicles crossing the bridges described in subdivision (a) is as follows:Number of axlesToll Two axles$ 2.00Three axles4.00Four axles6.25Five axles9.25Six axles10.00Seven axles & more11.50(c) (1) If the voters approve a toll increase, pursuant to Section 30923, the authority shall increase the base toll rate for vehicles crossing the bridges described in subdivision (a) from the toll rates then in effect by the amount approved by the voters pursuant to Section 30923. The authority may, beginning six months after the election approving the toll
 increase, phase in the toll increase over a period of time and may adjust the toll increase for inflation based on the California Consumer Price Index after the toll increase has been phased in completely.

(2) Revenue generated from the adjustment of the toll to account for inflation pursuant to paragraph (1) may be expended for the following purposes:

(A) Bridge maintenance and rehabilitation necessary to preserve, protect, and replace the bridge structures consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 30950.3.

(B) Supplemental funding for the projects and programs authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30914.7.

(d) The authority shall increase the
 amount of the toll only if required to meet its obligations on any bonds or to satisfy its covenants under any bond resolution or indenture. The authority shall hold a public hearing before adopting a toll schedule reflecting the increased toll charge.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the adoption of either a discounted commute rate for two-axle vehicles or of special provisions for high-occupancy vehicles under terms and conditions prescribed by the authority in consultation with the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 650, Sec. 9.   (SB 595)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

30917.

Pursuant to a special election in 1988 held in the City and County of San Francisco and the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, San Mateo, Santa Clara, and Solano, the voters approved a uniform toll charge of one dollar ($1) for class I vehicles crossing the state-owned toll bridges within the geographic jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission. Except as provided in Section 30914, the revenue derived from that toll increase shall be used to finance capital
 outlay for bridge construction and major bridge improvements as is fiscally practicable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30918.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to maintain tolls on all of the bridges specified in Section 30910 at rates sufficient to meet any obligation to the holders of bonds secured by the bridge toll revenues. The authority shall retain authority to set the toll schedule as may be necessary to meet those bond obligations. The authority shall provide at least 30 days’ notice to the transportation policy committee of each house of the Legislature and shall hold a public hearing before adopting a toll schedule reflecting the increased toll rate.

(b) The authority shall increase the toll rates specified in the adopted toll schedule in order to meet its obligations and covenants under any bond resolution or indenture of the authority for any outstanding toll bridge revenue bonds issued by the authority and the requirements of any constituent instruments defining the rights of holders of related obligations of the authority entered into pursuant to Section 5922 of the Government Code and, notwithstanding Section 30887 or subdivision (d) of Section 30916 of this code, or any other law, may increase the toll rates specified in the adopted toll schedule to provide funds for the planning, design, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, replacement, rehabilitation, and seismic retrofit of the state-owned toll bridges specified in Section 30910 of this code, to provide funding to meet the
 requirements of Sections 30884 and 30911 of this code, and to provide funding to meet the requirements of voter-approved regional measures pursuant to Sections 30914, 30921, and 30923 of this code.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the authority’s toll structure for the state-owned toll bridges specified in Section 30910 may vary from bridge to bridge and may include discounts consistent with the following:

(1) The authority may include discounts for the following vehicles:

(A) Vehicles classified by the authority as high-occupancy vehicles.
